Maryland, session 2026, SB0480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–1011.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE
RECREATION OVERSIGHT BOARD.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE
TRAIL FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–1011 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THERE IS AN OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE RECREATION
OVERSIGHT BOARD.
(C) (1) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND OFF–HIGHWAY
VEHICLE ALLIANCE;
– 1 –

Ch. 180 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND MOTORCYCLE
DEALERS ASSOCIATION;
(III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE AMERICAN MOTORCYCLIST
ASSOCIATION DISTRICT 7;
(IV) ONE INDIVIDUAL REPRESENTING ALL–TERRAIN VEHICLE,
UTILITY TERRAIN VEHICLE, OR SIDE–BY–SIDE VEHICLE DRIVERS; AND
(V) ONE INDIVIDUAL REPRESENTING ON– AND OFF–ROAD
MOTOR VEHICLE DRIVERS.
(2) EACH MEMBER SHALL BE A RESIDENT OF THE STATE.
(D) FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE BOARD SHALL ELECT A CHAIR EACH
YEAR.
(E) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY THE
TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD ON OCTOBER 1, 2026.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(5) IF A VACANCY OCCURS AMONG THE MEMBERS, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL PROMPTLY APPOINT A SUCCESSOR WHO SHALL SERVE UNTIL THE TERM
EXPIRES.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE BOARD.
(2) ADDITIONAL SUPPORT FOR THE BOARD SHALL BE PROVIDED BY:
(I) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(II) THE MARYLAND PARK SERVICE;
(III) THE FOREST SERVICE;
(IV) THE WILDLIFE AND HERITAGE SERVICE; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 180
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF EACH COUNTY IN WHICH AN
OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE TRAIL MAINTAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT
IS LOCATED, DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY.
(H) THE BOARD SHALL ADVISE THE SECRETARY ON THE OPERATION,
ACQUISITION, REGULATION, AND GENERAL OVERSIGHT OF OFF–HIGHWAY
RECREATIONAL VEHICLE TRAILS AND RECREATION IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
appointed members of the Off–Highway Recreational Vehicle Recreation Oversight Board
established under Section 1 of this Act shall expire as follows:
(1) one member in 2027;
(2) two members in 2028; and
(3) two members in 2029.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –